Utah statutes.
76-8-414.   Recording false or forged instruments.

Every person who knowingly procures or offers any false or forged instrument to be filed, registered, or recorded in any public office, which instrument, if genuine, might be filed or registered or recorded under any law of this state or of the United States, is guilty of a felony of the third degree.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

